test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-1-cîmân_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - cîmân :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      cîmân+N+I+Sg: cîmân   #  a canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Pl: cîmâna   #  canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Loc: [cîmânihk, cîmânih]   #  in a canoe

      # Poss
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nicîmân   #  my canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: ocîmân   #  his/her canoe
      

      # Nonposs
      cîmân+N+I+Sg: cîmân   #  a canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Pl: cîmâna   #  canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Loc: [cîmânihk, cîmânih]   #  in a canoe


      # Der/Dim
      cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [cîmânis, cîmânisîs]   #  a little canoe
      

      # Poss # Sg
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nicîmân   #  my canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kicîmân   #  your canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: ocîmân   #  his/her canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nicîmâninân   #  our canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kicîmâninaw   #  your and our canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kicîmâniwâw   #  your canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: ocîmâniwâw   #  their canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: ocîmânithiw   #  another's/others' canoe
      

      # Poss # Pl
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nicîmâna   #  my canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kicîmâna   #  your canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: ocîmâna   #  his/her canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nicîmâninâna   #  our canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kicîmâninawa   #  your and our canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kicîmâniwâwa   #  your canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: ocîmâniwâwa   #  their canoes
      cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: ocîmânithiwa   #  another's/others' canoes
      

      # Poss # Loc
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [nicîmânihk, nicîmânih]   #  in my canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: [kicîmânihk, kicîmânih]   #  in your canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: [ocîmânihk, ocîmânih]   #  in his/her canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: [nicîmâninâhk, nicîmâninâh]   #  in our canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc: [kicîmâninâhk, kicîmâninâh]   #  in your and our canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: [kicîmâniwâhk, kicîmâniwâh]   #  in your canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: [ocîmâniwâhk, ocîmâniwâh]   #  in their canoe
      cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: [ocîmânithihk, ocîmânithih]   #  in another's/others' canoe
      
